Hawaii statutes.
§342H-10.5 Disposition of collected
fines and penalties. Except as otherwise provided in this section, fines
and penalties collected under sections 342H-9 and 342H-10 shall be deposited
into the environmental response revolving fund established by section 128D-2.
Where a county individually, or the State and a county jointly, initiates and
conducts an investigation resulting in the imposition and collection of a fine
or penalty, pursuant to section 342H-30(c), the fine or penalty shall be
distributed as follows:

(1) One half to the department of the county whose
officers or employees initiated and conducted the investigation; and

(2) One half to the environmental response revolving
fund established in section 128D-2. [L 1991, c 157, §4; am L 1994, c 210, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next